Massachusetts, session 194th, H1337.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws, as amended by chapter xx of the acts of
2024, is hereby amended by inserting after section 17Y the following new section:-
Section 17Z. (a) Coverage offered by the commission to an active or retired employee of
the commonwealth insured under the group insurance commission shall provide coverage for
prescribed or dispensed opioid antagonists and opioid agonists, including partial agonists, used in
the treatment of opioid use disorder; provided, however that the coverage for such prescribed,
administered, ordered or dispensed opioid antagonists and opioid agonists, including partial
agonists, shall be deemed medically necessary and shall not require prior authorization; and
provided further that a prescription from a health care practitioner shall not be required for
coverage of opioid antagonists and opioid agonists, including partial agonists. An opioid
antagonist and an opioid agonist, including partial agonists, shall not be subject to any
deductible, coinsurance, copayments or out-of-pocket limits; provided, however, that cost-
of 9

sharing shall be required if the applicable plan is governed by the Internal Revenue Code and
would lose its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition on cost-sharing for this service.
(b) The commission shall provide coverage for an opioid antagonist and an opioid
agonist, including partial agonists, used in the treatment of opioid use disorder as a medical
benefit when dispensed or administered by the health care facility, including substance use
treatment facility, in which the opioid antagonist or opioid agonist, including partial agonists,
used in the treatment of opioid use disorder was prescribed, administered, or ordered and shall
provide coverage as a pharmacy benefit for an opioid antagonist and an opioid agonist, including
partial agonists, used in the treatment of opioid use disorder dispensed by a pharmacist;
provided, however, that the rate to be reimbursed under the medical benefit shall not exceed the
commission’s average in-network pharmacy benefit rate and the health care facility shall not
balance bill the patient. If dispensed directly to or administered to the patient, the commission
shall ensure cost to the health care facility is covered through reimbursement or other mechanism
as determined by the commission in consultation with the Department of Public Health, the
Division of Insurance, and the Division of Medical Assistance.
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as amended by chapter xx of the Acts of
2024, is hereby amended by inserting after section 10Y the following new section:-
Section 10Z. (a) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health
maintenance organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators
under contract to a Medicaid managed care organization, accountable care organization or
primary care clinician plan shall provide coverage for prescribed or dispensed opioid antagonists
and opioid agonists, including partial agonists, used in the treatment of opioid use disorder;
of 9

provided, however that the coverage for such prescribed, administered, ordered or dispensed
opioid antagonists and opioid agonists, including partial agonists, shall be deemed medically
necessary and shall not require prior authorization; and provided further that a prescription from
a health care practitioner shall not be required for coverage of opioid antagonists and opioid
agonists, including partial agonists. An opioid antagonist and an opioid agonist, including partial
agonists, shall not be subject to any deductible, coinsurance, copayments or out-of-pocket limits;
provided, however, that cost-sharing shall be required if the applicable plan is governed by the
Internal Revenue Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition on cost-
sharing for this service.
(b) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract
to a Medicaid managed care organization, accountable care organization or primary care
clinician plan shall provide coverage for an opioid antagonist and an opioid agonist, including
partial agonists, used in the treatment of opioid use disorder as a medical benefit when dispensed
or administered by the health care facility, including substance use treatment facility, in which
the opioid antagonist or opioid agonist, including partial agonists, used in the treatment of opioid
use disorder was prescribed, administered, or ordered and shall provide coverage as a pharmacy
benefit for an opioid antagonist and an opioid agonist, including partial agonists, used in the
treatment of opioid use disorder dispensed by a pharmacist; provided, however, that the rate to
be reimbursed under the medical benefit shall not exceed the carrier’s average in-network
pharmacy benefit rate and the health care facility shall not balance bill the patient. If dispensed
directly to or administered to the patient, the division shall ensure cost to the health care facility
of 9

is covered through reimbursement or other mechanism as determined by the commission in
consultation with the Department of Public Health and the Division of Insurance.
SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as amended by chapter xx of the Act of
2024 is hereby amended by inserting after section 47BBB the following new section:-
Section 47CCC. (a) Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance
issued, delivered or renewed within the commonwealth, which is considered creditable coverage
under section 1 of chapter 111M, shall provide coverage for prescribed or dispensed opioid
antagonists and opioid agonists, including partial agonists, used in the treatment of opioid use
disorder; provided, however that the coverage for such prescribed, administered, ordered or
dispensed opioid antagonists and opioid agonists, including partial agonists, shall be deemed
medically necessary and shall not require prior authorization; and provided further that a
prescription from a health care practitioner shall not be required for coverage of opioid
antagonists and opioid agonists, including partial agonists. An opioid antagonist and an opioid
agonist, including partial agonists, shall not be subject to any deductible, coinsurance,
copayments or out-of-pocket limits; provided, however, that cost-sharing shall be required if the
applicable plan is governed by the Internal Revenue Code and would lose its tax-exempt status
as a result of the prohibition on cost-sharing for this service.
(b) The policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance shall provide
coverage for an opioid antagonist and an opioid agonist, including partial agonists, used in the
treatment of opioid use disorder as a medical benefit when dispensed or administered by the
health care facility, including substance use treatment facility, in which the opioid antagonist or
opioid agonist, including partial agonists, used in the treatment of opioid use disorder was
of 9

prescribed, administered, or ordered and shall provide coverage as a pharmacy benefit for an
opioid antagonist and an opioid agonist, including partial agonists, used in the treatment of
opioid use disorder dispensed by a pharmacist; provided, however, that the rate to be reimbursed
under the medical benefit shall not exceed the carrier’s average in-network pharmacy benefit rate
and the health care facility shall not balance bill the patient. If dispensed directly to or
administered to the patient, the division shall ensure cost to the health care facility is covered
through reimbursement or other mechanism as determined by the division in consultation with
the Department of Public Health and the Division of Medical Assistance.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, as amended by chapter xx of the Act of
2024 is hereby amended by inserting after section 8CCC the following new section:-
Section 8DDD. (a) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an
individual or group hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the
commonwealth shall provide coverage for prescribed or dispensed opioid antagonists and
opioid agonists, including partial agonists, used in the treatment of opioid use disorder; provided,
however that the coverage for such prescribed, administered, ordered or dispensed opioid
antagonists and opioid agonists, including partial agonists, shall be deemed medically necessary
and shall not require prior authorization; and provided further that a prescription from a health
care practitioner shall not be required for coverage of opioid antagonists and opioid agonists,
including partial agonists. An opioid antagonist and an opioid agonist, including partial agonists,
shall not be subject to any deductible, coinsurance, copayments or out-of-pocket limits;
provided, however, that cost-sharing shall be required if the applicable plan is governed by the
of 9

100 Internal Revenue Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition on cost-
101 sharing for this service.
102 (b) Such contracts shall provide coverage for an opioid antagonist and an opioid agonist,
103 including partial agonists, used in the treatment of opioid use disorder as a medical benefit when
104 dispensed or administered by the health care facility, including substance use treatment facility,
105 in which the opioid antagonist or opioid agonist, including partial agonists, used in the treatment
106 of opioid use disorder was prescribed, administered, or ordered and shall provide coverage as a
107 pharmacy benefit for an opioid antagonist and an opioid agonist, including partial agonists, used
108 in the treatment of opioid use disorder dispensed by a pharmacist; provided, however, that the
109 rate to be reimbursed under the medical benefit shall not exceed the carrier’s average in-network
110 pharmacy benefit rate and the health care facility shall not balance bill the patient. If dispensed
111 directly to or administered to the patient, the division shall ensure cost to the health care facility
112 is covered through reimbursement or other mechanism as determined by the division in
113 consultation with the Department of Public Health and the Division of Medical Assistance.
114 SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as amended by chapter xx of the Act of
115 2024 is hereby amended by inserting after section 4CCC the following new section:-
116 Section 4DDD. (a) A subscription certificate under an individual or group medical
117 service
118 agreement delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage
119 for prescribed or dispensed opioid antagonists and opioid agonists, including partial agonists,
120 used in the treatment of opioid use disorder; provided, however that the coverage for such
121 prescribed, administered, ordered or dispensed opioid antagonists and opioid agonists, including
of 9

122 partial agonists, shall be deemed medically necessary and shall not require prior authorization;
123 and provided further that a prescription from a health care practitioner shall not be required for
124 coverage of opioid antagonists and opioid agonists, including partial agonists. An opioid
125 antagonist and an opioid agonist, including partial agonists, shall not be subject to any
126 deductible, coinsurance, copayments or out-of-pocket limits; provided, however, that cost-
127 sharing shall be required if the applicable plan is governed by the Internal Revenue Code and
128 would lose its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition on cost-sharing for this service.
129 (b) The policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance shall provide
130 coverage for an opioid antagonist and an opioid agonist, including partial agonists, used in the
131 treatment of opioid use disorder as a medical benefit when dispensed or administered by the
132 health care facility, including substance use treatment facility, in which the opioid antagonist or
133 opioid agonist, including partial agonists, used in the treatment of opioid use disorder was
134 prescribed, administered, or ordered and shall provide coverage as a pharmacy benefit for an
135 opioid antagonist and an opioid agonist, including partial agonists, used in the treatment of
136 opioid use disorder dispensed by a pharmacist; provided, however, that the rate to be reimbursed
137 under the medical benefit shall not exceed the carrier’s average in-network pharmacy benefit rate
138 and the health care facility shall not balance bill the patient. If dispensed directly to or
139 administered to the patient, the division shall ensure cost to the health care facility is covered
140 through reimbursement or other mechanism as determined by the division in consultation with
141 the Department of Public Health and the Division of Medical Assistance.
142 SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, as amended by chapter xx of the Act of
143 2024 is hereby amended by inserting after section 4UU the following new section:-
of 9

144 Section 4VV. (a) An individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or
145 renewed within or without the commonwealth shall provide coverage for prescribed or
146 dispensed opioid antagonists and opioid agonists, including partial agonists, used in the treatment
147 of opioid use disorder; provided, however that the coverage for such prescribed, administered,
148 ordered or dispensed opioid antagonists and opioid agonists, including partial agonists, shall be
149 deemed medically necessary and shall not require prior authorization; and provided further that a
150 prescription from a health care practitioner shall not be required for coverage of opioid
151 antagonists and opioid agonists, including partial agonists. An opioid antagonist and an opioid
152 agonist, including partial agonists, shall not be subject to any deductible, coinsurance,
153 copayments or out-of-pocket limits; provided, however, that cost-sharing shall be required if the
154 applicable plan is governed by the Internal Revenue Code and would lose its tax-exempt status
155 as a result of the prohibition on cost-sharing for this service.
156 (b) The individual or group health maintenance contract shall provide coverage for an
157 opioid antagonist and an opioid agonist, including partial agonists, used in the treatment of
158 opioid use disorder as a medical benefit when dispensed or administered by the health care
159 facility, including substance use treatment facility, in which the opioid antagonist or opioid
160 agonist, including partial agonists, used in the treatment of opioid use disorder was prescribed,
161 administered, or ordered and shall provide coverage as a pharmacy benefit for an opioid
162 antagonist and an opioid agonist, including partial agonists, used in the treatment of opioid use
163 disorder dispensed by a pharmacist; provided, however, that the rate to be reimbursed under the
164 medical benefit shall not exceed the carrier’s average in-network pharmacy benefit rate and the
165 health care facility shall not balance bill the patient. If dispensed directly to or administered to
166 the patient, the division shall ensure cost to the health care facility is covered through
of 9

167 reimbursement or other mechanism as determined by the division in consultation with the
168 Department of Public Health and the Division of Medical Assistance.
of 9